Alaska statutes. Title 45. Trade and Commerce.
Article 1. General Provisions and Definitions.

Sec. 45.04.101.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as Uniform Commercial Code — Bank Deposits and Collections.

History.

(§ 4.101 ch 114 SLA 1962; am § 78 ch 35 SLA 1993)

Collateral references. —

10 Am. Jur. 2d, Banks and Financial Institutions, § 1 et seq.

Construction and effect of UCC Art. 4 [AS 45.04], dealing with bank deposits and collections, 18 ALR3d 1376; 97 ALR3d 714; 22 ALR4th 10; 29 ALR4th 631; 88 ALR4th 568; 88 ALR4th 613; 88 ALR4th 664.

Sec. 45.04.102.
Applicability.

To the extent that items within this chapter are also within AS 45.03 and 45.08, they are subject to those chapters. If there is conflict, this chapter governs AS 45.03, but AS 45.08 governs this chapter.

The liability of a bank for action or nonaction with respect to an item handled by it for purposes of presentment, payment, or collection is governed by the law of the place where the bank is located. In the case of action or nonaction by or at a branch or separate office of a bank, its liability is governed by the law of the place where the branch or separate office is located.

History.

(§ 4.102 ch 114 SLA 1962; am § 79 ch 35 SLA 1993)

Collateral references. —

Liability of bank for diversion to benefit of presenter or third party of proceeds of check drawn to bank’s order by drawer not indebted to bank, 69 ALR4th 778.

Sec. 45.04.103.
Variation by agreement; measure of damages; certain action constituting ordinary care.

The effect of this chapter may be varied by agreement, but the parties to the agreement may not disclaim a bank’s responsibility for its lack of good faith or failure to exercise ordinary care or limit the measure of damages for the lack or failure. However, the parties may determine by agreement the standards by which the bank’s responsibility is to be measured if the standards are not manifestly unreasonable.

Federal Reserve regulations and operating circulars, clearinghouse rules, and the like have the effect of agreements under (a) of this section, whether or not specifically assented to by all parties interested in items handled.

Action or nonaction approved by this chapter or under Federal Reserve regulations or operating circulars is the exercise of ordinary care and, in the absence of special instructions, action or nonaction consistent with clearinghouse rules and the like or with a general banking usage not disapproved by this chapter is prima facie the exercise of ordinary care.

The specification or approval of certain procedures by this chapter is not disapproval of other procedures that may be reasonable under the circumstances.

The measure of damages for failure to exercise ordinary care in handling an item is the amount of the item reduced by an amount that could not have been realized by the exercise of ordinary care, and if there is also bad faith it includes any other damages the party suffered as a proximate consequence.

History.

(§ 4.103 ch 114 SLA 1962; am § 80 ch 35 SLA 1993)

Sec. 45.04.104.
Definitions and index of definitions.

In this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires,

“account” means a deposit or credit account with a bank, including a demand, time, savings, passbook, share draft, or like account, other than an account evidenced by a certificate of deposit;

“afternoon” means the period of a day between noon and midnight;

“banking day” means that part of a day on which a bank is open to the public for carrying on substantially all of its banking functions;

“clearinghouse” means an association of banks or other payors regularly clearing items;

“customer” means a person having an account with a bank or for whom a bank has agreed to collect items, including a bank that maintains an account at another bank;

“documentary draft” means a draft to be presented for acceptance or payment if specified documents, certificated securities under AS

45.08.102

, instructions for uncertificated securities under AS

45.08.102

, or other certificates, statements, or the like are to be received by the drawee or other payor before acceptance or payment of the draft;

“draft” means a draft as defined in AS

45.03.104

or an item, other than an instrument, that is an order;

“drawee” means a person ordered in a draft to make payment;

“item” means an instrument or a promise or order to pay money handled by a bank for collection or payment; the term does not include a credit or debit card slip;

“midnight deadline” with respect to a bank is midnight on its next banking day following the banking day on which it receives the relevant item or notice, or from which the time for taking action commences to run, whichever is later;

“settle” means to pay in cash, by clearinghouse settlement, in a charge or credit or by remittance, or otherwise as agreed; a settlement may be either provisional or final;

“suspends payments” with respect to a bank means that it has been closed by order of the supervisory authorities, that a public officer has been appointed to take it over, or that it ceases or refuses to make payments in the ordinary course of business.

Other definitions applying to this chapter and the sections in which the definitions appear are:

“agreement for electronic presentment” in AS

45.04.110

;

“bank” in AS

45.04.105

;

“collecting bank” in AS

45.04.105

;

“depositary bank” in AS 45.04.105;

“intermediary bank” in AS 45.04.105;

“payor bank” in AS 45.04.105;

“presenting bank” in AS 45.04.105;

“presentment notice” in AS

45.04.110

.

The following definitions in AS 45.03 apply to this chapter:

“acceptance” (AS

45.03.409

);

“alteration” (AS

45.03.407

);

“cashier’s check” (AS

45.03.104

);

“certificate of deposit” (AS

45.03.104

);

“certified check” (AS

45.03.409

);

“check” (AS 45.03.104);

“control” (AS

45.07.116

);

[Repealed, § 113 ch 44 SLA 2009.]

“holder in due course” (AS

45.03.302

);

“instrument” (AS 45.03.104);

“notice of dishonor” (AS

45.03.503

);

“order” (AS

45.03.103

);

“ordinary care” (AS

45.03.103

);

“person entitled to enforce” (AS

45.03.301

);

“presentment” (AS

45.03.501

);

“promise” (AS 45.03.103);

“prove” (AS 45.03.103);

“teller’s check” (AS 45.03.104);

“unauthorized signature” (AS

45.03.403

).

In addition, AS 45.01 contains general definitions and principles of construction and interpretation applicable throughout this chapter.

History.

(§ 4.104 ch 114 SLA 1962; am §§ 81 — 88, 127 ch 35 SLA 1993; am § 3 ch 17 SLA 1996; am §§ 27, 113 ch 44 SLA 2009)

Revisor’s notes. —

Paragraphs (a)(7) and (8) were formerly (a)(12) and (13). Renumbered in 1994, at which time the entry for former (a)(9) was deleted and the remaining paragraphs renumbered accordingly.

Paragraph (c)(7) was enacted as (c)(19) and renumbered in 2009, at which time former paragraphs (c)(7) — (19) were renumbered accordingly.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective January 1, 2010, repealed (c)(7) [now (c)(8)], which read, “ ‘good faith’ (AS

45.03.103

);”; and added (c)(19) [now (c)(7)].

Collateral references. —

Bank’s right to stop payment on its own check or money order, 97 ALR3d 714.

What is documentary draft under UCC § 4-104(1)(f), 65 ALR4th 1095.

Sec. 45.04.105.
“Bank”; “depositary bank”; “intermediary bank”; “collecting bank”; “payor bank”; “presenting bank.”

In this chapter,

“bank” means a person engaged in the business of banking, including a savings bank, savings and loan association, credit union, or trust company;

“collecting bank” means a bank handling an item for collection except the payor bank;

“depositary bank” means the first bank to take an item even though it is also the payor bank, unless the item is presented for immediate payment over the counter;

“intermediary bank” means a bank to which an item is transferred in course of collection except the depositary or payor bank;

“payor bank” means a bank that is the drawee of a draft;

“presenting bank” means a bank presenting an item except a payor bank.

History.

(§ 4.105 ch 114 SLA 1962; am § 89 ch 35 SLA 1993)

Revisor’s notes. —

This section was reorganized in 2006 to maintain alphabetical order.

Collateral references. —

Construction of UCC § 4-105, which defines “payor bank,” “collecting bank,” and the like, 84 ALR3d 1073.

Sec. 45.04.106.
Payable through or payable at bank; collecting bank.

If an item states that it is “payable through” a bank identified in the item, the item designates the bank as a collecting bank and does not by itself authorize the bank to pay the item, and the item may be presented for payment only by or through the bank.

If an item states that it is “payable at” a bank identified in the item, the item is equivalent to a draft drawn on the bank.

If a draft names a nonbank drawee and it is unclear whether a bank named in the draft is a co-drawee or a collecting bank, the bank is a collecting bank.

History.

(§ 4.106 ch 114 SLA 1962; am § 90 ch 35 SLA 1993)

Sec. 45.04.107.
Separate office of a bank.

A branch or separate office of a bank is a separate bank for the purpose of computing the time within which and determining the place at or to which action may be taken or notices or orders must be given under this chapter and under AS 45.03.

History.

(§ 4.107 ch 114 SLA 1962; am § 91 ch 35 SLA 1993)

Collateral references. —

10 Am. Jur. 2d, Banks and Financial Institutions, § 630 et seq.

Construction of UCC § 4-106 defining separate or branch office of bank, 5 ALR4th 665.

Sec. 45.04.108.
Time of receipt of items.

To allow time to process items, prove balances, and make the necessary entries on its books to determine its position for the day, a bank may fix an afternoon hour of two o’clock in the afternoon or later as a cutoff hour for the handling of money and items and the making of entries on the books of the bank.

An item or deposit of money received on a day after a cutoff hour so fixed or after the close of the banking day may be treated as received at the opening of the next banking day.

History.

(§ 4.108 ch 114 SLA 1962; am § 92 ch 35 SLA 1993)

Sec. 45.04.109.
Delays.

Unless otherwise instructed, a collecting bank in a good faith effort to secure payment of a specific item drawn on a payor other than a bank, and with or without the approval of a person involved, may waive, modify, or extend time limits imposed or permitted by the code for a period not exceeding two additional banking days without discharge of drawers or endorsers or liability to its transferor or a prior party.

Delay by a collecting bank or payor bank beyond time limits prescribed or permitted by the code or by instructions is excused if the delay is caused by interruption of communication or computer facilities, suspension of payments by another bank, war, emergency conditions, failure of equipment, or other circumstances beyond the control of the bank, and if the bank exercises the diligence circumstances require.

History.

(§ 93 ch 35 SLA 1993)

Collateral references. —

10 Am. Jur. 2d, Banks, § 813.

Sec. 45.04.110.
Electronic presentment.

“Agreement for electronic presentment” means an agreement, clearinghouse rule, or Federal Reserve regulation or operating circular, providing that presentment of an item may be made by transmission of an image of an item or information describing the item, a “presentment notice,” rather than delivery of the item itself. The agreement may provide for procedures governing retention, presentment, payment, dishonor, and other matters concerning items subject to the agreement.

Presentment of an item under an agreement for presentment is made when the presentment notice is received.

If presentment is made by presentment notice, a reference to “item” or “check” in this chapter means the presentment notice unless the context otherwise indicates.

History.

(§ 93 ch 35 SLA 1993)

Sec. 45.04.111.
Statute of limitations.

An action to enforce an obligation, duty, or right arising under this chapter must be commenced within three years after the cause of action accrues.

History.

(§ 93 ch 35 SLA 1993)